Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 53.1-186.
Term commences from date of final judgment; exceptions.

The term of confinement in a local or state correctional facility for the commission of a crime shall commence and be computed from the date of the final judgment, which, in case of an appeal, shall be that of the refusal of a writ of error or the affirmance of the judgment. When it is ordered that two or more terms of confinement run concurrently, then such terms of confinement shall commence and be computed from the time the first of such terms of confinement commenced.

For the purpose of determining allowances for good conduct, the term of confinement of a person convicted of a felony and sentenced to the Department whose sentence is partially suspended shall be that portion of the sentence which was not suspended.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-207, 53-272; 1954, c. 141; 1956, c. 342; 1958, c. 468; 1962, c. 327; 1976, c. 145; 1982, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and
345, cl. 3 provides: “That any person under a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2021, but who has not been executed by July 1, 2021, shall have his sentence changed to life imprisonment, and such person who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense shall not be eligible for (i) parole, (ii) any good conduct allowance or any earned sentence credits under Chapter 6 ( §

53.1-186

et seq.) of Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia, or (iii) conditional release pursuant to
§

53.1-40.01

or

53.1-40.02

of the Code of Virginia.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 76, 78, 81, 85.

§ 53.1-187.
Credit for time spent in confinement while awaiting trial.

Any person who is sentenced to a term of confinement in a correctional facility shall have deducted from any such term all time actually spent by the person in a state hospital for examination purposes or treatment prior to trial, in a state or local correctional facility awaiting trial or pending an appeal, or in a juvenile detention facility awaiting trial for an offense for which, upon conviction, such juvenile is sentenced to an adult correctional facility. Such credit for time shall include any time spent in pretrial confinement or detention on separate, dismissed, or nolle prosequi charges that are from the same act as the violation for which the person is convicted and sentenced to a term of confinement. When entering the final order in any such case, the court shall provide that the person so convicted be given credit for the time so spent.

In no case shall a person be allowed credit for time not actually spent in confinement or in detention. In no case is a person on bail to be regarded as in confinement for the purposes of this statute. No such credit shall be given to any person who escapes from a state or local correctional facility or is absent without leave from a juvenile detention facility.

Any person sentenced to confinement in a correctional facility, in whose case the final order entered by the court in which he was convicted fails to provide for the credit authorized by this section, shall nevertheless receive credit for the time so spent in a correctional facility. Such allowance of credit shall be in addition to the good conduct allowance provided for in §§

53.1-116

and

53.1-129

, Articles 2 (§

53.1-192

et seq.) and 3 (§

53.1-198

et seq.) or the earned sentence credits provided for in Article 4 (§

53.1-202.2

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 53-208; 1968, c. 105; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 313; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2022, c. 399.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 399 inserted the penultimate sentence in the first paragraph; and in the last paragraph, deleted “state” preceding “correctional facility” twice, inserted “§§

53.1-116

and

53.1-129

,” and deleted “of this chapter” following both “(§

53.1-198

et seq.)” and “(§

53.1-202.2

et seq.)”; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 83; 7A M.J. Escape, § 1.

§ 53.1-188.
Conduct records to be kept.

The Director shall keep a record of the conduct of each person confined in a state correctional facility. Each time any prisoner in a state correctional facility is punished, the name of the offender, the offense, the time when the offense was committed, and when and what disciplinary action was taken or sentence was imposed, shall be recorded in a register.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-209, 53-215; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-189.
Forfeiture and restoration of good conduct allowance and earned sentence credits.

Except for credits allowed under §

53.1-191

, all or any part of a person’s accrued good conduct allowance and earned sentence credits earned after admission to a state correctional facility on any sentence or combination of sentences being served may be forfeited in accordance with rules and regulations of the Director for violation of any written prison rules or regulations.

If a prisoner is convicted of escape or attempted escape from any correctional facility, such person shall, upon being returned to custody, forfeit all accrued good conduct allowance and all earned sentence credits on any sentence or combination of sentences being served, except for credits allowed under §

53.1-191

.

No good conduct allowance or earned sentence credit which has been forfeited shall be restored except by the Director, whose authority shall not be delegated.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-214; 1974, c. 69; 1980, c. 485; 1981, c. 392; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 734; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director” for “Board” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For survey of the law in the Fourth Circuit on habeas corpus and prisoner’s rights, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 625 (1977).

§ 53.1-190.
Allowance on discharge; transportation; clothing.

The Director, upon the release of a prisoner who has served at least eight months, shall give the prisoner all funds accumulated to his credit pursuant to §§

53.1-42

and

53.1-43

and not withdrawn by him. In the event such funds do not total twenty-five dollars, the Director may add sufficient money from the appropriation to the Department to enable the prisoner to have a minimum of twenty-five dollars available for withdrawal by him at the time of his release. The Director also may provide such person upon his request with transportation to the county or city where he was committed, or to such other point in the Commonwealth as may be approved by the Director. Such person may also be furnished suitable clothing.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-219; 1964, c. 421; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-191.
Credits allowed in cases of injuries to or extraordinary services performed by prisoners; nonforfeiture of credits hereunder.

The Director, with the consent of the Governor, may allow to any prisoner confined in a state correctional facility a credit toward his term of confinement if he (i) renders assistance in preventing the escape of another prisoner or in the apprehension of an escaped prisoner; (ii) gives a blood donation to another prisoner; (iii) voluntarily or at the instance of a prison official renders other extraordinary services; or (iv) suffers bodily injury while in the prison system. The Director shall determine the amount of any such credit for each such service or injury. In unusual circumstances a prisoner may receive credit for donating blood, under regulations prescribed by the Director, to blood banks licensed by or subject to regulations of the State Board of Health. The Director may allow the credit permitted by this section to a prisoner who has been sentenced to the Department of Corrections but who is confined in a local correctional facility.

Except as provided hereafter, any credit allowed under the provisions of this section shall be applied as provided in §

53.1-199

. A prisoner who has been sentenced to a term of life imprisonment or to two or more life sentences shall be eligible for credits allowed under the provisions of this section. One-half of such credit shall be applied to reduce the period of time such prisoner shall serve before being eligible for parole.

Credits allowed under the provisions of this section may not be forfeited under §

53.1-189

. Credits shall not be allowed under the provisions of this section to apply toward a term of confinement imposed upon a conviction of a felony offense committed on or after January 1, 1995.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-220; 1952, c. 8; 1976, c. 209; 1981, c. 392; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 253; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2002, c. 59; 2020, c. 759.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 59 added the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director” for “Board” wherever it appears in the first paragraph.